California, session 20252026, AB1648.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 1.8 (commencing with Section 103872) is added to Part 2 of Division 102 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 1.8. California Epilepsy Program103872. For the purposes of this chapter, “epilepsy” means a disorder of the brain characterized by one or more unprovoked seizures or the diagnosis of an epilepsy syndrome.103872.1 (a) The department shall establish the California Epilepsy Program for the purposes of conducting epidemiological assessments of the incidence and prevalence of epilepsy and seizures. The program shall encompass any area of the state for which epilepsy and seizure incidence or prevalence data are available.(b) The department may seek, receive, and spend any funds received through appropriations, grants, or donations from public or private sources for the purposes of the program.(c) The department shall convene an advisory panel comprised of medical professionals with expertise in epilepsy and seizures, scientific researchers, advocates for individuals with epilepsy, and other individuals with relevant expertise to provide support and advice for the implementation of the program.(d) The department may contract with an entity, including, but not limited to, a health systems agency, single-county health department, multicounty health department grouping, or nonprofit professional association for the purposes of collecting and collating epilepsy and seizure incidence and prevalence data.(e) The department shall analyze available epilepsy and seizure incidence and prevalence data and prepare and publish reports on its internet website as necessary.(f) The department shall publish on its internet website a listing of public agencies that offer services to individuals affected by epilepsy, including, but not limited to, Medi-Cal, regional centers, and the Department of Education. This list may also include private entities that offer services to individuals affected by epilepsy.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________